New York, session 2025-2026, A11162.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 308 of the laws of 2012 amending the 2 general municipal law relating to providing local governments greater 3 contract flexibility and cost savings by permitting certain shared 4 purchasing among political subdivisions, as amended by chapter 455 of 5 the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, and shall expire and be 7 deemed repealed June 30, [2026] 2027. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14493-02-6